Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 56. Weights and Measures.
§ 3.2-5634.
Meat, poultry, and seafood.

All meat, meat products, poultry (whole or parts), and all seafood except shellfish, offered or exposed for sale, or sold, as food shall be offered or exposed for sale and sold by weight, except for immediate consumption on the premises where sold, or as one of several elements comprising a ready-to-eat meal sold as a unit for consumption elsewhere than on the premises where sold. When meat, poultry, or seafood is combined with or associated with some other food elements to form either a distinctive food product or a food combination, such food product or combination shall be offered or exposed for sale and sold by weight, and the quantity representation may be the total weight of the product or combination, and a quantity representation need not be made for each of the several elements of the product or combination. Cooked poultry that is offered or exposed for sale, or sold, as a commodity in package form, it may be sold by minimum net weight and so labeled notwithstanding the provisions of §

3.2-5623

of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.32; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-950; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5635.
Bulk sale and delivery of commodities.

All sales in which the buyer and seller are not both present to witness the measurement of a bulk delivery shall be accompanied by duplicate delivery tickets containing the following information:

The name and address of the buyer and seller;

The date of delivery;

The quantity delivered in terms of pounds, tons, gallons or cubic measure; and

If applicable, the count of individually wrapped packages, if more than one.

History.

1993, c. 604, § 3.1-954.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5636.
Scale house in establishment where livestock is bought from producers.

The scale house at any livestock auction market, receiving station, packing plant, or other establishment where livestock is regularly bought from producers shall be constructed so that all parties in interest may readily observe the weighing of livestock. The weighbeam or indicating apparatus shall be situated so that the weight indications thereon are clearly visible to public view. Provisions shall be made whereby the weighmaster from his normal weighing position has full view of the stock rack on the scale platform, the approaches thereto, and the livestock being weighed. Ready access from the unloading platform or chutes to the scale house must be provided to enable owners of livestock to get to the scale in time to see their livestock weighed. A sign clearly visible to public view shall be affixed on or adjacent to the scale house with the following phrase in letters at least three inches in height: “TO HELP AVOID ERRORS WATCH LIVESTOCK WEIGHED.”

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.40, 59-106.1; 1954, c. 93; 1958, c. 629; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-958; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5637.
Type registering weighbeams or automatic weight recorders required.

Type registering weighbeams or automatic weight recorders shall be installed and used with proper tickets for weighing livestock at all livestock auction markets.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.41, 59-114.1; 1952, c. 387; 1954, c. 93; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-959; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5638.
Weight of livestock to be determined on date of sale.

When livestock is offered for sale on a weight basis at livestock auction markets on regular sale days, the weights thereof shall be determined on the date of the sale at such auction markets unless otherwise publicly announced at the auction ring at time of sale.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.42, 59-114.2; 1952, c. 387; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-960; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5639.
Announcement of day and hour of livestock sale.

The operator of the livestock auction market shall publicly announce the day and hour when an auction sale of livestock is to begin at least one week in advance of the day of sale so chosen and shall include the time of sale in all information thereafter published concerning the sale. Auction sale of livestock shall begin on the day and hour so selected.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.43, 59-114.3; 1952, c. 387; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-961; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5640.
Certain merchants to provide scales for use of customers.

Any person engaged, in the sale of items by weight from a self-service bulk display, shall make available a scale for use by his customers and shall upon request provide customer assistance in weighing of all commodities. The scale shall be accurate and maintained in good working order.

History.

1972, c. 497; 1993, c. 604, § 3.1-962.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5641.
Use of word “cord” in connection with purchase or sale of wood, bark, or other forest product.

It shall be unlawful to use the word “cord” or any abbreviation thereof other than to mean the standard as defined in §

3.2-5600

in, or in connection with the purchase or sale of pulpwood, firewood, tanbark, or any forest product customarily measured in cords of any size whatever, or in connection with any quotation of price, or measurement of, or settlement, or payment for any such wood, bark or product, in reference to any cord, unit or measurement.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.38, 59-101.1; 1950, p. 480; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-956; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5642.
Determining number of board feet in tree or log.

The standard rule for determining the number of board feet in a tree or log in the Commonwealth shall be the “International 1/4 Inch Log Rule.” The provisions of this section shall not prevent the buyer and the seller from agreeing that some other unit of measurement shall be used to determine the number of board feet in trees or logs, provided that such other unit of measurement is specified in a written contract between them.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-109.39, 59-101.2; 1960, c. 242; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-957; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5643.
Obstructing Commissioner or sealers; penalty.

Any person who shall hinder or obstruct in any way the Commissioner, his assistant, or any one of the inspectors, or a sealer in the performance of his official duties is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.45, 59-136; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-963; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5644.
Impersonating Commissioner or sealer.

Any person who shall impersonate in any way the Commissioner, his agent, or any one of the inspectors, or a sealer by the use of his seal or a counterfeit of his seal, or in any other manner, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.46, 59-137; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-964; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5645.
Certain acts declared misdemeanors.

Any person who, by himself or by his servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of another person, performs any one of the acts enumerated in subdivisions 1 through 9 of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor:

Use or have in possession for the purpose of using for any commercial purpose, sell, offer, or expose for sale or hire, or have in possession for the purpose of selling or hiring, an incorrect weight or measure of any device or instrument used to or calculated to falsify any weight or measure.

Use or have in possession for the purpose of current use for any commercial purpose specified in §

3.2-5609

a weight or measure that does not bear a seal or mark such as is specified in §

3.2-5613

, unless such weight or measure has been: (i) placed into service by a certified service technician pursuant to §

3.2-5711

; (ii) exempted from testing by the provisions of §

3.2-5609

; or (iii) exempted by a regulation of the Board issued under the authority of §

3.2-5607

or

3.2-5620

.

Dispose of any rejected or condemned weight or measure in a manner contrary to law or regulation.

Remove from any weight or measure, contrary to law or regulation, any tag, seal, or mark placed thereon by the appropriate authority.

Sell, or offer or expose for sale, less than the quantity he represents of any commodity, thing, or service.

Take more than the quantity he represents of any commodity, thing, or service when, as buyer, he furnishes the weight or measure by means of which the amount of the commodity, thing, or service is determined.

Keep for the purpose of sale, advertise, or offer or expose for sale, or sell, any commodity, thing, or service in a condition or manner contrary to law or regulation.

Use in retail trade a weight or measure that is not so positioned that its indications may be accurately read and the weighing or measuring operation observed from some position that may reasonably be assumed by a customer, except in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale and of medical prescriptions.

Violate any provisions of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter for which a specific penalty has not been prescribed.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-708.47, 59-138, 59-139; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-965; 1993, c. 604; 2008, cc. 255, 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 255, amended former § 3.1-965, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 255 has been given effect in this section as set out above, by inserting “(i) placed into service by a certified service technician pursuant to §

3.2-5711

;” “(ii),” and “(iii) exempted” in subdivision 2.

§ 3.2-5646.
Civil penalties; suit to enjoin violation; compromise.

The Commissioner may bring a suit to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter, or any regulation made pursuant thereto, in the circuit court of the county or city where the violation occurs, or in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond if the violation may affect more than one county or city. The Commissioner may request either the attorney for the Commonwealth or the Attorney General to take action under this section, when appropriate.

Any person violating a provision of this chapter or regulations adopted hereunder may be assessed a civil penalty by the Board in an amount not to exceed $1,000. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Board shall give due consideration to: (i) the history of previous violations of the person; (ii) the seriousness of the violation; and (iii) the demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with the chapter after notification of the violation.

Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Weights and Measures Fund as established in §

3.2-5628

. The Commissioner shall prescribe procedures for payment of uncontested penalties. The procedure shall include provisions for a person to consent to abatement of the alleged violation and pay a penalty or negotiated sum in lieu of such penalty without admission of civil liability arising from such alleged violation.Final orders may be recorded, enforced, and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Commissioner. The orders may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-966.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5647.
Warning instead of report of violation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter, minor violations of this chapter, whenever the Commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

1991, c. 605, § 3.1-966.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5648.
Presumptive proof of use of weight, measure or weighing or measuring device.

For the purposes of this chapter, proof of the existence of a weight or measure or a weighing or measuring device in or about any building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle in which or from which it is shown that buying or selling is commonly carried on, shall, in the absence of conclusive evidence to the contrary, be presumptive proof of the regular use of such weight or measure or weighing or measuring device for commercial purposes, and shall be presumptive proof of such regular use by the person in charge of such building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-708.49; 1962, c. 298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-967; 1993, c. 604; 2008, c. 860.